Utah statutes.
10-3-918.   Chief of police or marshal in a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town.

The chief of police or marshal in each city of the third, fourth, or fifth class or town:

(1)  shall:

(a)  exercise and perform the duties that are prescribed by the legislative body;

(b)  be under the direction, control, and supervision of the person or body that appointed the chief or marshal; and

(c)  on or before January 1, 2003, adopt a written policy that prohibits the stopping, detention, or search of any person when the action is solely motivated by considerations of race, color, ethnicity, age, or gender; and

(2)  may, with the consent of the person or body that appointed the chief or marshal, appoint assistants to the chief of police or marshal.

